Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 4 of this Act may be cited as the Kentucky Women's Bill of Rights.
(2) The purpose of the Kentucky Women's Bill of Rights is to bring clarity, certainty,
and uniformity to the laws of Kentucky regarding sex discrimination, equality of
the sexes, and benefits or services specifically provided to males and to females.
(3) The Kentucky Women's Bill of Rights applies wherever Kentucky law or policy
classifies people on the basis of sex or otherwise defines people as being male or
female, men or women, or boys or girls, as these terms are defined in Section 2 of
this Act.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 10:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1327
As used in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Boy" means a human male who is a legal minor under Kentucky law;
(2) "Equal" does not mean same or identical with respect to equality of the sexes;
(3) "Female," when used in reference to a natural person, means an individual who:
(a) Has, had, or will have through the course of normal development; or
(b) Would have but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident;
the reproductive system that at some point produces ova;
(4) "Girl" means a human female who is a legal minor under Kentucky law;
(5) "Male," when used in reference to a natural person, means an individual who:
(a) Has, had, or will have through the course of normal development; or
(b) Would have but for a developmental anomaly, genetic anomaly, or accident;
the reproductive system that at some point produces sperm;
(6) "Man" means an adult human of the male sex;
(7) (a) "Sex," when used in reference to a natural person:
1. Refers to the biological sex of either male or female as observed or
clinically verified at birth;
2. Is objective and fixed; and
3. Does not include gender identity or any other terms intended to convey
a person's subjective sense of self. Gender identity and other subjective
terms are not synonyms or substitutes for sex.
(b) There are only two (2) sexes, and every individual is either male or female.
Individuals with differences in sex development, or DSD, sometimes
referred to as intersex conditions, are not a third sex. Individuals with a
congenital and medically verifiable DSD diagnosis shall be accommodated
consistent with state and federal law; and
(8) "Woman" means an adult human of the female sex.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 10:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1327
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any state or local law, administrative regulation, ordinance, or policy that
prohibits sex discrimination shall be construed to prohibit unfair treatment of
males or females in relation to similarly situated members of the opposite sex. It
shall not be construed to prohibit separation of the sexes in the interest of
maintaining safety, privacy, and fairness as specified in this section.
(2) (a) Because the Commonwealth of Kentucky has an important interest in
preventing unjust discrimination and in maintaining safety, privacy, and
fairness, the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions and
instrumentalities may provide single-sex environments for males and
females where the sexes are not similarly situated, particularly with respect
to biology.
(b) As illustrative, non-exhaustive examples, public entities in the
Commonwealth may distinguish between the sexes with respect to prisons
and other detention centers, athletics, living facilities, locker rooms,
bathrooms, domestic violence shelters, and rape crisis centers without
violating antidiscrimination mandates.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any public school, public school district, state agency, department, local
government, special district, or subdivision of these entities that collects vital
statistics related to sex for the purpose of:
(a) Complying with state or federal antidiscrimination laws; or
(b) Gathering accurate public health, crime, economic, or other data;
shall identify each natural person who is part of the collected dataset as either
male or female as defined in Section 2 of this Act.
(2) Compliance with this section shall not require the collection of data relating to
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 10:09 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1327
sex unless otherwise required by law, and shall not prevent the collection of
additional data points other than biological sex.
Section 5. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/23/2025 10:09 AM Jacketed